Idaho statutes. Title 20 STATE PRISON AND COUNTY JAILS
Chapter 5
JUVENILE CORRECTIONS ACT

Sec.

§ 20-501. Legislative intent.

It is the policy of the state of Idaho that the juvenile corrections system will be based on the following principles: accountability; community protection; and competency development. Where a juvenile has been found to be within the purview of the juvenile corrections act, the court shall impose a sentence that will protect the community, hold the juvenile offender accountable for his actions, and assist the juvenile offender in developing skills to become a contributing member of a diverse community. It is the further policy of the state of Idaho that the parents or other legal guardians of the juvenile offender participate in the accomplishment of these goals through participation in counseling and treatment designed to develop positive parenting skills and an understanding of the family’s role in the juvenile offender’s behavior. It is the further intent of the legislature that the parents of the juvenile offender be held accountable, where appropriate, through monetary reimbursement for supervision and confinement of the juvenile offender, and restitution to victims of the juvenile offender’s delinquent acts. In enacting this legislation, the legislature finds that the juvenile corrections system should encompass the following aspects: day treatment, community programs, observation and assessment programs, probation services, secure facilities, after-care and assistance to counties for juvenile offenders not committed to the custody of the department of juvenile corrections.

The following is a brief description of what the legislature intends to become the components of Idaho’s juvenile corrections system:

Probation. Probation officers would have twenty-four (24) hour on call responsibility for juvenile offenders and would monitor their activities on a continual basis. Probation officers would be responsible for assisting juvenile offenders and their families in accessing counseling or treatment resources, close supervision of juvenile offenders’ activities, supervision of restitution and coordination of other services provided to juvenile offenders. Juvenile offenders ordered into the custody of the department of juvenile corrections would be monitored by a county probation officer.

Day treatment. Day treatment programs would be time limited nonresidential treatment and educational programs. Included in these programs would be trackers who would provide intensive supervision of juvenile offenders through daily contact and by counseling juvenile offenders regarding employment, education, courts, family and life skills. Nonresidential alcohol and drug programs would provide outpatient assessment and counseling for juvenile offenders with substance abuse problems.

Community programs. It is intended that community programs would exist throughout the state to provide twenty-four (24) hour residential supervision and treatment options to juvenile offenders in close proximity to their families and their community. It is intended that these programs would strengthen the juvenile offender’s relationship with family, engender a commitment to school and employment, promote the development of competency and life skills and help juvenile offenders generalize appropriate behavior into their environment.
Observation and assessment. Regional observation and assessment centers would be provided, either directly or on a contract basis, to conduct observation and assessment of the juvenile offender in a short-term residential experience. It is intended that these programs would maintain standardized home and daily routines with intensive daily programming.

Secure facilities. Secure facilities would provide secure confinement, discipline, education and treatment of the most seriously delinquent juvenile offenders. Programs at the secure facilities would be designed to help juvenile offenders recognize accountability for delinquent behavior by confronting and eliminating delinquent norms, criminal thinking and antisocial behavior and making restitution to victims through community service or other restitution programs.

It is the further intent of the legislature that the primary purpose of this act is to provide a continuum of programs which emphasize the juvenile offender’s accountability for his actions while assisting him in the development of skills necessary to function effectively and positively in the community in a manner consistent with public safety. These services and programs will individualize treatment and control of the juvenile offender for the benefit of the juvenile offender and the protection of society. It is legislative intent that the department of juvenile corrections be operated within the framework of the following principles to accomplish this mission:

Provide humane, disciplined confinement to a juvenile offender who presents a danger to the community.

Strengthen opportunities for the juvenile offender’s development of competency and life skills by expanding the juvenile offender’s access to applicable programs and community resources.

Hold juvenile offenders accountable for their delinquent behavior through such means as victim restitution, community service programs and the sharing of correctional costs.

Invoke the participation of the juvenile offender’s parent or legal guardian in assisting the juvenile offender to recognize and accept responsibility for his delinquent or other antisocial behavior and hold the parent accountable, where appropriate, through the payment of detention costs and restitution to victims and through attendance at programs for the development of positive parenting skills designed to promote a functional relationship between the juvenile offender and his family.

Develop efficient and effective juvenile correctional programs within the framework of professional correctional standards, legislative intent and available resources.

Provide for a diversity of innovative and effective programs through research on delinquent behavior and the continuous evaluation of correctional programs.

Assist counties in developing meaningful programs for juvenile offenders who have come into the juvenile corrections system but who have not been committed to the custody of the department of juvenile corrections.

Provide programs to increase public awareness of the mission of the juvenile corrections system and encourage public participation in developing an effective juvenile corrections system designed to aid in reducing juvenile crime in this state.

Develop and maintain a statewide juvenile offender information system.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 1, p. 876; am. 1984, ch. 81, § 2, p. 148; am. 1989, ch. 155, § 1, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 2, p. 65; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 1, p. 39; am. 2012, ch. 257, § 5, p. 709.

§ 20-502. Definitions.

When used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adult” means a person eighteen (18) years of age or older.

“Commit” means to transfer legal custody.

“Community-based program” means an in-home confinement program or a nonsecure or staff secure residential or nonresidential program operated to supervise and provide competency development to juvenile offenders in the least restrictive setting, consistent with public safety, operated by the state or under contract with the state or by the county.

“Court” means any district court within the state of Idaho, or magistrate’s division thereof.

“Department” means the state department of juvenile corrections.

“Detention” means the temporary placement of juvenile offenders who require secure custody for their own or the community’s protection in physically restricting facilities.

“Director” means the director of the department of juvenile corrections.

“Diversion” means the utilization of local community resources, churches, counseling for the juvenile offender and/or family, substance abuse counseling, informal probation, community service work, voluntary restitution, or any other available service or program as an alternative to the filing of a petition with the juvenile court.

“Judge” means a district judge or a magistrate.

“Juvenile” means a person less than eighteen (18) years of age or who was less than eighteen (18) years of age at the time of any alleged act, omission or status.

“Juvenile correctional center” means any state-operated residential facility or facility operated pursuant to a contract with the state that provides twenty-four (24) hour supervision and confinement for juvenile offenders committed to the custody of the department.

“Juvenile detention center” means a secure facility established pursuant to sections 20-517 and 20-518, Idaho Code, and in compliance with IDAPA 05.01.02.

“Juvenile offender” means a person under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of any act, omission or status and who has been adjudicated as being within the purview of this chapter.

“Legal custody” means the relationship created by the court’s decree which imposes upon the custodian responsibilities of physical possession of the juvenile offender, the duty to protect, train and discipline him and to provide him with food, shelter, education and ordinary medical care.

“Legal guardian” means a person appointed as guardian of a minor under the laws of Idaho. For the purposes of this chapter, legal guardian does not include and shall not be construed to include the owner, operator or the agent of an owner or operator of a detention center, observation and assessment center, secure facility, residential facility or other facility having temporary or long-term physical custody of the juvenile offender.

“Observation and assessment program” means any state-operated or purchased service program responsible for temporary custody of juvenile offenders for observation and assessment.

“Secure facility” means any architecturally secure residential facility that provides twenty-four (24) hour supervision and confinement for juvenile offenders committed to the custody of the department.
(18) “Staff secure facility” means a nonarchitecturally secure residential facility with awake staff twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week for intensive supervision of juvenile offenders.

(19) “Work program” means a public service work project which employs juvenile offenders at a reasonable wage for the purpose of reimbursing victims of the juvenile offender’s delinquent behavior.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 2, p. 876; am. 1973, ch. 27, § 1, p. 51; am. 1984, ch. 81, § 3, p. 148; am. 1989, ch. 155, § 2, p. 371; am. 1990, ch. 245, § 1, p. 696; am. 1990, ch. 355, § 1, p. 958; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 3, p. 65; am. 1995, ch. 277, § 1, p. 925; am. 1997, ch. 83, § 1, p. 195; am. 2000, ch. 139, § 1, p. 365; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 2, p. 39.

§ 20-503. Department of juvenile corrections created — Appointment of director — Powers and duties of department.

The department of juvenile corrections is hereby created. The department shall, for the purposes of section 20, article IV, of the constitution of the state of Idaho, be an executive department of the state government.

The department shall be under the control and supervision of a director, who shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. The director shall exercise all of the powers and duties necessary to carry out the proper administration of the department and may delegate duties to employees and officers of the department. The director shall have the authority to employ an attorney or attorneys to provide legal services to the department and such managers, assistants, clerical staff and other employees necessary to the proper functioning and administration of the department.

The department of juvenile corrections shall be composed of such administrative units as may be established by the director for the proper and efficient administration of the powers and duties assigned to the director or the department. The director shall appoint an administrator for each administrative unit within the department.

The director shall have full power and authority to do all things necessary to establish and provide for the administration and operation of the department of juvenile corrections and to accomplish an orderly transition to the department of juvenile corrections and the counties of the duties and responsibilities for juvenile offenders and the juvenile justice system being performed by the department of health and welfare. It is intended that the director and staff of the department of health and welfare work cooperatively with the director and staff of the department of juvenile corrections and the counties in this effort, while continuing with their duties to juvenile offenders in the custody of the department of health and welfare until the official transfer of such duties to the department of juvenile corrections and the counties on October 1, 1995.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-503, as added by 1995, ch. 44, § 4, p. 65; am. 1995, ch. 277, § 2, p. 925; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 3, p. 39.

§ 20-504. Duties of the department of juvenile corrections.

The department shall have jurisdiction over all juvenile offenders committed to it pursuant to chapter 5, title 20, Idaho Code.

The department shall have legal custody over all juvenile offenders committed to it by the courts of this state for confinement. The department shall not have legal guardianship of any juvenile offender.

The department is responsible for all juvenile offenders committed to it by the courts of this state for confinement. The department shall also establish minimum standards for detention, care and certification of approved detention facilities based upon such standards.

The department shall establish and administer all secure residential facilities including all state juvenile correctional centers.

The department shall make all decisions regarding placement of juvenile offenders committed to it in the most appropriate program for supervision and treatment.

The department shall establish an observation and assessment process for juvenile offenders committed to it by a court.

The department shall establish liaison services with the counties or within the department’s regions.

The department may establish and operate work programs designed to employ juvenile offenders committed to it in public service work projects for the purpose of reimbursing victims of the juvenile offender’s delinquent behavior.

The department is hereby authorized and may place juvenile offenders committed to it pursuant to this chapter in a community-based or private program; provided, that the person, agency or association operating the facility or program has been approved and has otherwise complied with all applicable state and local laws.

The department shall establish minimum standards for the operation of all private residential and nonresidential facilities and programs that provide services to juvenile offenders committed to the department. The standards shall be no more stringent than standards imposed for facilities operated by the department or for detention facilities operated by counties.

The department shall provide technical assistance to counties establishing research-based programs for juvenile offenders who either have been found to come under the purview of this chapter or who have had their case informally diverted pursuant to section 20-511, Idaho Code, and who have not been committed to the legal custody of the department.

The department shall have authority to adopt such administrative rules pursuant to the procedures provided in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, as are deemed necessary or appropriate for the functioning of the department and the implementation and administration of this act.

Subject to any competitive bidding requirements otherwise provided by law, the department shall have authority to enter into contracts with a private association or organization or other public agency or organization for the inspection and licensure of detention facilities.

Subject to any competitive bidding requirements otherwise provided by law, the department shall have authority to enter into contracts with private providers or local governmental agencies for the confinement or other permanent or temporary placement of juvenile offenders committed to its custody.
(15) The department shall have authority to apply for, receive and expend federal funds, subject to appropriation by the legislature. The department shall have authority to establish guidelines for and administer the distribution of state juvenile corrections act funds to counties for the employment and training of county probation officers, the establishment of secure and nonsecure residential or nonresidential facilities and programs for juvenile offenders. The department may require that a county provide matching funds as a condition of receiving juvenile corrections act funds. The department, by rule, in cooperation with the courts and the counties, shall establish uniform standards for county juvenile probation services, as well as qualifications for and standards for the training of juvenile probation officers.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1826, as added by 1989, ch. 155, § 9, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 5, p. 65; am. 1995, ch. 277, § 3, p. 925; am. 1997, ch. 83, § 2, p. 195; am. 1997, ch. 261, § 1, p. 745; am. 2000, ch. 139, § 2, p. 365; am. 2003, ch. 35, § 1, p. 154; am. 2004, ch. 50, § 2, p. 236; am. 2007, ch. 47, § 1, p. 118; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 4, p. 39.

§ 20-504A. State juvenile correctional centers — Purposes — Powers and duties of the department and the director.

The purposes of a juvenile correctional center shall be:

The care, control and competency development of adjudicated juvenile offenders meeting standards for admission as adopted by the Idaho supreme court;

The provision pursuant to agreement with the counties of detention services for juvenile offenders subject to administrative or court order;

The provision of observation and assessment services for juvenile offenders committed to the department of juvenile corrections; and

To accept for placement those individuals sentenced to a state juvenile correctional center by a district court, or pursuant to agreement with the board of correction, subsequent to waiver of juvenile court jurisdiction.

The department shall administer and provide general oversight of all state juvenile correctional centers and any other secure or nonsecure facilities holding juvenile offenders committed to it as required by the juvenile corrections act.

The department shall assure that the educational programs of state juvenile correctional centers are in compliance with educational standards that are approved by the Idaho state board of education or an accrediting association recognized by the Idaho state board of education.

The department shall have the power to promulgate rules in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, for the administration and operation of state juvenile correctional centers.

The director shall have the power:

To employ, fix the salary and prescribe the duties of a superintendent for each juvenile correctional center. The superintendent shall be a nonclassified employee and shall serve at the pleasure of the director. With the advice of the director, the superintendent may appoint and prescribe the duties of assistants, instructors, specialists and other employees required for the operation of the center;

To remove any employee of a juvenile correctional center for cause or as allowed by chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code;

To ensure that all teachers, except specialists, hold teaching certificates issued under the authority of the state board of education which are valid for the grades and subjects taught. All specialists shall hold diplomas from an accredited school of their specialty;

To have, at all times, general supervision and control of all property, real and personal, appertaining to the center, and to insure the same; and

To expend tax moneys appropriated, or otherwise placed to the credit of the center for maintenance and operation and to account for the same as prescribed by law.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-504A, as added by 1997, ch. 83, § 3, p. 195; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 5, p. 39.

§ 20-505. Jurisdiction.

Subject to the prior jurisdiction of the United States, the court shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction over any juvenile and over any adult who was a juvenile at the time of any act, omission or status, in the county in which the juvenile resides, or in the county in which the act, omission or status allegedly took place, in the following cases:

Where the act, omission or status occurs in the state of Idaho and is prohibited by federal, state, local or municipal law or ordinance by reason of minority only;

Where the act or omission occurs in the state of Idaho and is a violation of any federal, state, local or municipal law or ordinance which would be a crime if committed by an adult;

Concerning any juvenile where the juvenile comes under the purview of the interstate compact for juveniles as set forth in chapter 19, title 16, Idaho Code;

This chapter shall not apply to juvenile violators of beer, wine or other alcohol and tobacco laws; except that a juvenile violator under the age of eighteen (18) years at the time of the violation may, at the discretion of the court, be treated under the provisions of this chapter, provided that a juvenile taken into custody pursuant to section 20-516(1)(c), Idaho Code, for an alcohol age infraction under section 18-1502(e), Idaho Code, shall be treated within the provisions of this chapter;

This chapter shall not apply to the juvenile offenders who are transferred for criminal prosecution as an adult, as provided in this chapter;

This chapter shall not apply to juvenile violators of traffic, watercraft, fish and game, failure to obey a misdemeanor citation and criminal contempt laws; except that a juvenile violator under the age of eighteen (18) years at the time of such violation may, at the discretion of the court, be treated under the provisions of this chapter;

This chapter shall not apply to juvenile sex offenders who violate the provisions of section 18-8414, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1803, as added by 1976, ch. 233, § 2, p. 823; am. 1981, ch. 112, § 1, p. 168; am. 1981, ch. 222, § 6, p. 412; am. 1982, ch. 110, § 1, p. 311; am. 1984, ch. 81, § 4, p. 148; am. 1990, ch. 355, § 2, p. 958; am. 1993, ch. 154, § 2, p. 390; am. 1994, ch. 150, § 1, p. 344; am. 1994, ch. 414, § 2, p. 1302; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 6, p. 65; am. 1996, ch. 261, § 3, p. 857; am. 1998, ch. 69, § 1, p. 262; am. 1999, ch. 388, § 1, p. 1083; am. 1999, ch. 389, § 1, p. 1085; am. 2002, ch. 185, § 1, p. 536; am. 2004, ch. 270, § 3, p. 752; am. 2005, ch. 94, § 1, p. 314; am. 2005, ch. 187, § 1, p. 573; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 6, p. 39; am. 2016, ch. 344, § 2, p. 987.

§ 20-506. Transfer from other courts.

If during the pendency of a criminal or quasi-criminal charge against any juvenile in any other court, it shall be ascertained that the juvenile was under the age of eighteen (18) years at the time of committing the alleged offense, except where such juvenile has left the state, or where said charge is that such juvenile is a juvenile traffic, beer, wine or other alcohol or tobacco violator, or is within the purview of section 20-508(1)(a) or (1)(b), Idaho Code, it shall be the duty of such court forthwith to transfer the case, together with all the papers, documents and testimony connected therewith, to the court having jurisdiction over the juvenile with respect to the offense charged. The court making such transfer shall order the juvenile to be taken forthwith to the court to which the transfer is being made or place of detention designated by the court or shall release the juvenile to the custody of some suitable person to be brought before the court at a time designated. The court to which the case is transferred shall then proceed as provided in this act.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 4, p. 876; am. 1981, ch. 222, § 7, p. 412; am. 1982, ch. 110, § 2, p. 311; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 7, p. 65.

§ 20-507. Retention of jurisdiction.

Jurisdiction obtained by the court in the case of a juvenile offender shall be retained by it for the purposes of this act until he becomes twenty-one (21) years of age, unless terminated prior thereto. If a juvenile offender under the jurisdiction of the court and after attaining eighteen (18) years of age, is charged with a felony, he shall be treated as any other adult offender. If a person eighteen (18) years of age or older already under court jurisdiction is convicted of a felony, that conviction shall terminate the jurisdiction of the court, provided however, nothing herein contained shall prohibit any court from proceeding as provided in section 20-508(2), Idaho Code.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 5, p. 876; am. 1984, ch. 81, § 5, p. 148; am. 1989, ch. 155, § 3, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 8, p. 65; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 7, p. 39.

§ 20-508. Waiver of jurisdiction and transfer to other courts.

After the filing of a petition and after full investigation and hearing, the court may waive jurisdiction under the juvenile corrections act over the juvenile and order that the juvenile be held for adult criminal proceedings when:

A juvenile is alleged to have committed any of the crimes enumerated in section 20-509, Idaho Code; or

A juvenile is alleged to have committed an act other than those enumerated in section 20-509, Idaho Code, after the child became fourteen (14) years of age which would be a crime if committed by an adult; or

An adult at the time of the filing of the petition is alleged to have committed an act prior to his having become eighteen (18) years of age which would be a felony if committed by an adult, and the court finds that the adult is not committable to an institution for people with intellectual disabilities or mental illness, is not treatable in any available institution or facility available to the state designed for the care and treatment of juveniles, or that the safety of the community requires the adult continue under restraint; or

An adult already under the jurisdiction of the court is alleged to have committed a crime while an adult.

A motion to waive jurisdiction under the juvenile corrections act and prosecute a juvenile under the criminal law may be made by the prosecuting attorney, the juvenile, or by motion of the court upon its own initiative. The motion shall be in writing and contain the grounds and reasons in support thereof.

Upon the filing of a motion to waive jurisdiction under the juvenile corrections act, the court shall enter an order setting the motion for hearing at a time and date certain and shall order a full and complete investigation of the circumstances of the alleged offense to be conducted by county probation, or such other agency or investigation officer designated by the court.

Upon setting the time for the hearing upon the motion to waive jurisdiction, the court shall give written notice of said hearing to the juvenile, and the parents, guardian or custodian of the juvenile, and the prosecuting attorney, at least ten (10) days before the date of the hearing, or a lesser period stipulated by the parties, and such notice shall inform the juvenile and the parents, guardian or custodian of the juvenile of their right to court appointed counsel. Service of the notice shall be made in the manner prescribed for service of a summons under section 20-512, Idaho Code.

The hearing upon the motion to waive jurisdiction shall be held in the same manner as an evidentiary hearing upon the original petition and shall be made part of the record.

If as a result of the hearing on the motion to waive jurisdiction the court shall determine that jurisdiction should not be waived, the petition shall be processed in the customary manner as a juvenile corrections act proceeding. However, in the event the court determines, as a result of the hearing, that juvenile corrections act jurisdiction should be waived and the juvenile should be prosecuted under the criminal laws of the state of Idaho, the court shall enter findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which it bases such decision together with a decree waiving juvenile corrections act jurisdiction and binding the juvenile over to the authorities for prosecution under the criminal laws of the state of Idaho.

No motion to waive juvenile corrections act jurisdiction shall be recognized, considered, or heard by the court in the same case once the court has entered an order or decree in that case that said juvenile has come within the purview of the juvenile corrections act, and all subsequent proceedings after the decree finding the juvenile within the purview of the act must be under and pursuant to the act and not as a criminal proceeding.

In considering whether or not to waive juvenile court jurisdiction over the juvenile, the juvenile court shall consider the following factors:

The seriousness of the offense and whether the protection of the community requires isolation of the juvenile beyond that afforded by juvenile facilities;

Whether the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive, violent, premeditated, or willful manner;

Whether the alleged offense was against persons or property, greater weight being given to offenses against persons;

The maturity of the juvenile as determined by considerations of his home, environment, emotional attitude, and pattern of living;

The juvenile’s record and previous history of contacts with the juvenile corrections system;

The likelihood that the juvenile will develop competency and life skills to become a contributing member of the community by use of facilities and resources available to the court;

The amount of weight to be given to each of the factors listed in subsection (8) of this section is discretionary with the court, and a determination that the juvenile is not a fit and proper subject to be dealt with under the juvenile court law may be based on any one (1) or a combination of the factors set forth within this section, which shall be recited in the order of waiver.

If the court does not waive jurisdiction and order a juvenile or adult held for criminal proceedings, the court in a county other than the juvenile’s or adult’s home county, after entering a decree that the juvenile or adult is within the purview of this chapter, may certify the case for sentencing to the court of the county in which the juvenile offender or adult resides upon being notified that the receiving court is willing to accept transfer. In the event of a transfer, which should be made unless the court finds it contrary to the interest of the juvenile offender or adult, the jurisdiction of the receiving court shall attach to the same extent as if the court had original jurisdiction.

Upon conviction of a juvenile offender held for adult criminal proceedings under this section, the sentencing judge may, if a finding is made that adult sentencing measures would be inappropriate:

Sentence the convicted person in accordance with the juvenile sentencing options set forth in this chapter; or

Sentence the convicted person to the county jail or to the custody of the state board of correction but suspend the sentence and retain jurisdiction pursuant to section 19-2601A, Idaho Code, and commit the defendant to the dual custody of the department of juvenile corrections and the state board of correction.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1806, as added by 1977, ch. 165, § 2, p. 427; am. 1981, ch. 162, § 1, p. 284; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 9, p. 65; am. 1995, ch. 47, § 1, p. 111; am. 1995, ch. 277, § 4, p. 925; am. 1997, ch. 82, § 1, p. 192; am. 1999, ch. 390, § 1, p. 1086; am. 2000, ch. 246, § 2, p. 686; am. 2007, ch. 308, § 2, p. 862; am. 2010, ch. 235, § 9, p. 542; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 8, p. 39; am. 2015, ch. 113, § 6, p. 281.

§ 20-509. Violent offenses, controlled substances violations near schools and offenders.

Any juvenile, age fourteen (14) years to age eighteen (18) years, who is alleged to have committed any of the following crimes or any person under age fourteen (14) years who is alleged to have committed any of the following crimes and, pursuant to section 20-508, Idaho Code, has been ordered by the court to be held for adult criminal proceedings:

Murder of any degree or attempted murder;

Robbery;

Rape as defined in section 18-6101, Idaho Code;

Forcible sexual penetration by the use of a foreign object;

Infamous crimes against nature, committed by force or violence;

Mayhem;

Assault or battery with the intent to commit any of the above serious felonies;

A violation of the provisions of section 37-2732(a)(1)(A), (B) or (C), Idaho Code, when the violation occurred on or within one thousand (1,000) feet of the property of any public or private primary or secondary school, or in those portions of any building, park, stadium or other structure or grounds which were, at the time of the violation, being used for an activity sponsored by or through such a school;

Arson in the first degree and aggravated arson;

Once a juvenile has been formally charged or indicted pursuant to this section or has been transferred for criminal prosecution as an adult pursuant to the waiver provisions of section 20-508, Idaho Code, or this section, the juvenile shall be held in a county jail or other adult prison facility unless the court, after finding good cause, orders otherwise.

Except as otherwise allowed by subsection (4) of this section, once a juvenile offender has been found to have committed the offense for which the juvenile offender was charged, indicted or transferred pursuant to this section or section 20-508, Idaho Code, or has been found guilty or pled guilty to a lesser offense or amended charge growing out of or included within the original charge, whether or not such lesser offense or amended charge is included within the acts enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, the juvenile offender shall thereafter be handled in every respect as an adult. For any subsequent violation of Idaho law, the juvenile offender shall be handled in every respect as an adult.

Upon the conviction of a juvenile offender pursuant to this section, the sentencing judge may, if a finding is made that adult sentencing measures would be inappropriate:

Sentence the convicted person in accordance with the juvenile sentencing options set forth in this chapter; or
(b) Sentence the convicted person to the county jail or to the custody of the state board of correction but suspend the sentence pursuant to section 19-2601A, Idaho Code, and commit the defendant to the dual custody of the department of juvenile corrections and the state board of correction.

shall be charged, arrested and proceeded against by complaint, indictment or information as an adult. All other felonies or misdemeanors charged in the complaint, indictment or information, which are based on the same act or transaction or on one (1) or more acts or transactions as the violent or controlled substances offense shall similarly be charged, arrested and proceeded against as an adult. Any juvenile proceeded against pursuant to this section shall be accorded all constitutional rights, including bail and trial by jury, and procedural safeguards as if that juvenile were an adult defendant.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1806A, as added by 1981, ch. 151, § 1, p. 262; am. 1984, ch. 81, § 6, p. 148; am. 1990, ch. 268, § 5, p. 755; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 10, p. 65; am. 1995, ch. 46, § 1, p. 110; am. 1995, ch. 47, § 2, p. 111; am. 1995, ch. 48, § 1, p. 114; am. 1997, ch. 142, § 1, p. 413; am. 2000, ch. 73, § 1, p. 686; am. 2000, ch. 246, § 3, p. 155; am. 2007, ch. 308, § 3, p. 862; am. 2010, ch. 352, § 10, p. 920; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 9, p. 39; am. 2015, ch. 113, § 7, p. 281; am. 2016, ch. 296, § 13, p. 828.

§ 20-510. Information — Investigation — Petition.

Any peace officer, any prosecuting attorney, or any authorized representative of the board of trustees of a school district of this state, having knowledge of a juvenile who is within the purview of this act may file a petition with the court in such form as may be required by the court, except a peace officer may also issue a citation for a curfew violation pursuant to section 20-549, Idaho Code. Said individual or agency shall be responsible for providing the evidence to support the allegations made in the petition, provided this in no way shall relieve peace officers from enforcement of the law as set forth in section 31-2227, Idaho Code. The court may make a preliminary inquiry to determine whether the interests of the public or of the juvenile require that further action be taken. Such inquiry may be made through the county probation officer or such other agent or investigation officer designated by the court. Thereupon, the court may make such informal adjustment as is practicable, or dismiss the petition, or set the matter for hearing. If an informal adjustment is made, it shall provide for full or partial restitution in the manner and form prescribed by the court when the offense involves loss or damage of property of another. A probation officer shall not file a petition unless the juvenile has previously been under the jurisdiction of the court. The petition and all subsequent court documents shall be entitled “In the interest of ..., a juvenile under eighteen (18) years of age.” The petition may be made upon information and belief but it shall be made under oath. It shall set forth plainly: (1) the facts which bring the juvenile within the purview of this act; (2) the name, age, and residence of the juvenile; (3) the names and residences of his parents and spouse, if any; (4) the name and residence of his legal guardian, if there be one, or the person or persons having custody or control of the juvenile, or of the nearest known relative if no parent or guardian can be found. If any of the facts herein required are not known by the petitioner the petition shall so state.

Service of a petition upon the parents, legal guardian or person or persons having custody or control of the juvenile shall subject the parents, legal guardian or person or persons having custody or control of the juvenile to the provisions of this chapter. The petition shall inform the parents, legal guardian or other person legally obligated to care for and support the juvenile that service of the petition upon them shall make them subject to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 7, p. 876; am. 1977, ch. 156, § 1, p. 399; am. 1989, ch. 155, § 4, p. 371; am. 1990, ch. 355, § 3, p. 958; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 11, p. 65; am. 2000, ch. 74, § 1, p. 157; am. 2006, ch. 177, § 1, p. 544.